Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Statewide Immunization Program.

Sec. 18.09.200.
Statewide immunization program established; commissioner’s duties.

In addition to health promotion and vaccine registration activities of the department, a statewide immunization program is established in the department for the purpose of monitoring, purchasing, and distributing included vaccines to providers approved by the department who agree to provide the included vaccines to state residents under terms consistent with the program and state and federal law.

The commissioner shall

establish a procedure that provides for participation by an assessable entity;

maintain a list of recommended vaccines for inclusion in the program;

for each included vaccine, establish the initial vaccine assessment for the first year of the program and thereafter make annual assessments based on the determinations made by the council established under AS

18.09.210

;

notify assessable entities and other program participants of the annual vaccine assessment for each vaccine included in the program;

devise a method for crediting to assessable entities and other program participants overpayments of vaccine assessments made for reasons related to administrative error, program termination, or lower than anticipated actual usage of the program by covered individuals;

coordinate collective purchases of included vaccines;

establish a procedure for statewide distributions of vaccines purchased under the program; and

review vaccine assessment appeals for error.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective August 9, 2019, in (b)(1), deleted “to phase in the program over a three-year period” following “procedure”.

Sec. 18.09.210.
State Vaccine Assessment Council; members; duties.

The State Vaccine Assessment Council is established in the department for the purpose of determining the amount of vaccine assessments made by the commissioner to be paid by assessable entities and other program participants in the state under procedures established by the council.

The council consists of eight members appointed by the commissioner as follows:

the department’s chief medical officer for public health or the chief medical officer’s designee, who shall serve as chair;

two health care providers licensed in the state, one of whom must be a pediatrician;

three members representing health care insurers licensed in the state under AS 21.54, one of whom must be a plan administrator; each insurer must represent a different organization in the state;

a representative of a tribal or public health insurance plan;

the director of the division of insurance or the director’s designee.

A member appointed to the council under (b)(2) — (4) of this section serves without compensation and reimbursement of expenses for a term of three years or until a successor is appointed. A member may not serve more than two consecutive terms.

The council shall meet at the call of the chair and conduct business by majority vote.

The department shall provide staff and other assistance to the council.

The council shall

establish and implement a plan of operation to

determine the amount of the annual vaccine assessment, subject to review by the commissioner, for each included vaccine for each covered individual following the initial vaccine assessment amounts determined by the commissioner;

use a method for determining the vaccine assessment amount that attributes to each assessable entity and other program participant the proportionate costs of included vaccines for covered individuals;

establish procedures for the collection and deposit of the vaccine assessment;

establish procedures for collecting and updating data from assessable entities and other program participants as necessary for the operation of the program and the determination of the annual vaccine assessment; the data collected must include the number of covered individuals by each assessable entity and other program participant and the annual vaccine program usage by each covered individual;

devise a system for reducing surplus payments made by an assessable entity and other program participant by crediting past overpayments to current year vaccine assessments;

submit to the commissioner and to the legislature, not later than July 1 of each year, an annual financial report, including assessment determinations and overall costs of the program, in a form acceptable to the commissioner and the legislature;

monitor compliance with the program requirements and vaccine assessments and submit a periodic noncompliance report to the commissioner and the director of insurance that lists assessable entities and other program participants that failed to

remit vaccine assessments as determined by the council and approved by the commissioner; or

comply with a reporting or auditing requirement under the program after notice from the council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2014)

Sec. 18.09.220.
Vaccine assessment and reporting requirements.

An assessable entity and other program participant shall

pay to the department the annual combined vaccine assessments as determined under the program for the included vaccines covered by the assessable entity or other program participant for each covered individual on a schedule adopted by the council;

provide information requested by the council to determine the number of covered individuals, actual vaccine usage under the program, and other data necessary to calculate and monitor compliance with the vaccine assessment; and

provide audited financial statements upon request of the council.

A vaccine assessment must include a reasonable contribution toward support of the program and appropriate reserve funds, as determined by the council. A vaccine assessment may not include a provider fee for the administration of the vaccine.

A vaccine assessment shall be construed as a medical expense of the assessable entity or other program participant.

An assessable entity or other program participant may appeal a determination of a vaccine assessment made by the council to the commissioner within 10 days after receiving notification of the assessment. The commissioner shall review the appeal and all materials relevant to the assessment that is the subject of the appeal and shall modify the assessment if the commissioner finds substantial evidence of an error.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 17 SLA 2019.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2014; am §§
2, 6 ch 17 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective August 9, 2019, deleted “, after being phased into the program under procedures approved by the commissioner,” at the end of the introductory language in (a), and repealed (e).

Sec. 18.09.225.
Other program participants.

A health care provider or group of providers may opt into the program if approved by the commissioner under regulations adopted by the department.

An assessable entity may not deny a claim for coverage by a health care provider of vaccines not distributed under the program.

A health care provider may not bill a payor for or resell a vaccine distributed under the program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2014)

Sec. 18.09.230.
Vaccine Assessment Fund.

The vaccine assessment fund is created in the general fund for the purpose of providing funding for the program. The fund consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature, including program receipts attributable to vaccine assessments under AS

18.09.220

, fees under AS

18.09.240

, money from other sources, and interest earned on money in the fund. Appropriations to the fund do not lapse.

The commissioner shall administer the fund in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner may spend money appropriated to the fund for the purposes of the program under AS

18.09.200

and to pay the costs of administering the program without further appropriation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2014; am §§
3, 4 ch 17 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For transition provision providing for the deposit of unobligated funds remaining in the program established under sec. 2, ch. 24, SLA 2012 and repealed by sec. 6, ch. 30, SLA 2014 into the account created under this section, see sec. 7, ch. 30, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective August 9, 2019, rewrote (a), which read, “The vaccine assessment account is created as an account in the general fund. The legislature may appropriate to the account program receipts attributable to vaccine assessments under AS

18.09.220

, money from other sources, and interest earned on money in the account. Appropriations to the account do not lapse.”, and repealed and reenacted (b).

Sec. 18.09.240.
Penalties.

An assessable entity or other program participant that fails to pay a required annual vaccine assessment after notification of the assessment or fails to comply with a request for information necessary for determination of the assessment may be assessed an additional noncompliance fee as determined by the commissioner under regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2014)